Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3228.01, to read: START_STATUTE32-3228.01. Informed consent; surgical procedures; signature requirements; definition A. Except in an emergency, Informed consent for a surgical procedure obtained by a physician who is licensed pursuant to chapter 13 or 17 of this title, a nurse practitioner who is licensed pursuant to chapter 15 of this title or a physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to chapter 25 of this title shall include the signatures of the physician, nurse practitioner or physician assistant who is performing the surgical procedure, the patient or the patient's surrogate decision maker pursuant to section 36-3231 and a witness, as required by the health care facility's policies, if applicable, and the date. B. If a patient or a patient's surrogate decision maker pursuant to section 36-3231 is physically unable to sign or mark an informed consent, a witness shall verify on the document that the patient or the patient's surrogate decision maker directly indicated to the witness that the patient intended to consent to the surgical procedure. C. For the purposes of this section, "surgical procedure" means the excision of or incision in a patient's body for any of the following: 1. The correction of a deformity or defect. 2. The repair of an injury. 3. The diagnosis, amelioration or cure of a disease. END_STATUTE